Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,162
Foreign corporation; renouncing domestication.

Any foreign corporation, which has domesticated pursuant to section 21-19,161, may cease to be a domesticated corporation by filing with the Secretary of State a certified copy of a resolution adopted by its board of directors, renouncing its domestication and withdrawing its acceptance and agreement provided for in section 21-19,161.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 162.